Hawaii statutes.
[§6D-11] General administrative penalties.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the board or its authorized
representative by proper delegation, with respect to a violation of this
chapter or any rule adopted or permit issued in accordance with this chapter,
may:

(1) Set, pursuant to subsection (b), charge, and
collect administrative fines or bring legal action to recover administrative
fees and costs, as documented by receipts or affidavit, including attorneys'
fees and costs; or

(2) Bring legal action to recover administrative
fines, fees, and costs, including attorneys' fees and costs, payment for
damages, or for the cost to correct damages, resulting from violation of this
chapter or any rule adopted or permit issued in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Administrative fines shall be as follows:

(1) For a first violation, a fine of not more than
$10,000 for each separate offense;

(2) For a second violation within five years of a
previous violation, a fine of not more than $15,000; and

(3) For a third or subsequent violation within five
years of the last violation, a fine of not more than $30,000. [L 2002, c 241,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next